Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 5. Industrial Hemp Extract Intended for Human Consumption.

§ 3.2-5145.1.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Food”
means any article that is intended for human consumption and introduction into commerce, whether the article is simple, mixed, or compound, and all substances or ingredients used in the preparation thereof. “Food” does not mean drug as defined in §

54.1-3401

.

“Industrial hemp extract”
means an extract (i) of a Cannabis sativa plant that has a concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol that is no greater than that allowed for hemp by federal law and (ii) that is intended for human consumption.

History.

2020, cc. 659, 660.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 659 and 660, cl. 2 provides: “That the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry, in consultation with the Secretary of Administration, shall by November 1, 2020, report to the Governor and the General Assembly a plan for the long-term sustainability of funding for the industrial hemp program, including consideration of the cost of testing the tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of hemp crops grown in Virginia as required by state or federal law.”

Acts 2020, cc. 659 and 660, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall, by November 1, 2020, report to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources regarding recommended legislative or regulatory amendments necessary to (i) allow a registered industrial hemp grower to grow industrial hemp with a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of no greater than one percent and (ii) authorize the Department to modify its existing industrial hemp program as quickly and efficiently as possible to respond to any final regulation adopted by the U.S. Department of Agriculture regarding the domestic production of hemp.”

Acts 2020, cc. 659 and 660, cl. 4 provides: “That nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services from adopting a tiered approach to testing of tetrahydrocannabinol concentrations at the processor level if such approach is not prohibited by federal law or by any rule or regulation of the U.S. Department of Agriculture.”

Effective date.

Acts 2020, cc. 659, 660, became effective April 6, 2020, by emergency clause.

§ 3.2-5145.2.
Industrial hemp extract; approved food.

An industrial hemp extract is a food and is subject to the requirements of this chapter and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

History.

2020, cc. 659, 660.

Effective date.

Acts 2020, cc. 659, 660, became effective April 6, 2020, by emergency clause.

§ 3.2-5145.2:1.
Sellers of industrial hemp extract.

Any person who sells or offers for sale an industrial hemp extract or food containing an industrial hemp extract shall be subject to the requirements of this chapter and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

History.

2022, , Sp. Sess. I, c. 2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2022, Sp. Sess. I, ch. 2, cl. 16 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 3.2-5145.3.
Manufacturer of industrial hemp extract or food containing an industrial hemp extract.

A manufacturer of an industrial hemp extract or food containing an industrial hemp extract shall be an approved source if the manufacturer operates:

Under inspection by the responsible food regulatory agency in the location in which such manufacturing occurs; and

In compliance with the laws, regulations, or criteria that pertain to the manufacturer of industrial hemp extracts or food containing an industrial hemp extract in the location in which such manufacturing occurs.

History.

2020, cc. 659, 660.

Effective date.

Acts 2020, cc. 659, 660, became effective April 6, 2020, by emergency clause.

§ 3.2-5145.4.
Industrial hemp extract requirements.

An industrial hemp extract shall (i) be produced from industrial hemp grown in compliance with applicable law and (ii) notwithstanding any authority under federal law to have a greater concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol, have a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of no greater than 0.3 percent.

In addition to the requirements of this chapter, an industrial hemp extract or food containing an industrial hemp extract shall comply with regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to §

3.2-5145.5

.

History.

2020, cc. 659, 660.

Effective date.

Acts 2020, cc. 659, 660, became effective April 6, 2020, by emergency clause.

§ 3.2-5145.5.
Regulations.

The Board is authorized to adopt regulations for the efficient enforcement of this article.

The Board shall adopt regulations identifying contaminants of an industrial hemp extract or a food containing an industrial hemp extract and establishing tolerances for such identified contaminants.

The Board shall adopt regulations establishing labeling requirements for an industrial hemp extract or a food containing an industrial hemp extract. Such regulations shall require that any industrial hemp extract or food containing an industrial hemp extract that contains tetrahydrocannabinol be equipped with a label that states (i) that the industrial hemp extract or food containing an industrial hemp extract contains tetrahydrocannabinol and may not be sold to persons younger than 21 years of age, (ii) all ingredients contained in the industrial hemp extract or food containing an industrial hemp extract, (iii) the amount of such industrial hemp extract or food containing an industrial hemp extract that constitutes a single serving, and (iv) the total percentage and milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol included in the industrial hemp extract or food containing an industrial hemp extract and the number of milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol that are contained in each serving.

The Board shall adopt regulations establishing batch testing requirements for industrial hemp extracts. The Board shall require that batch testing of industrial hemp extracts be conducted by an independent testing laboratory that meets criteria established by the Board.

With the exception of §

2.2-4031

, neither the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) nor public participation guidelines adopted pursuant thereto shall apply to the adoption of any regulation pursuant to this section. Prior to adopting any regulation pursuant to this section, the Board shall publish a notice of opportunity to comment in the Virginia Register of Regulations and post the action on the Virginia Regulatory Town Hall. Such notice of opportunity to comment shall contain (i) a summary of the proposed regulation; (ii) the text of the proposed regulation; and (iii) the name, address, and telephone number of the agency contact person responsible for receiving public comments. Such notice shall be made at least 60 days in advance of the last date prescribed in such notice for submittals of public comment. The legislative review provisions of subsections A and B of §

2.2-4014

shall apply to the promulgation or final adoption process for regulations pursuant to this section. The Board shall consider and keep on file all public comments received for any regulation adopted pursuant to this section.

History.

2020, cc. 659, 660; 2022, , Sp. Sess. I, c. 2.

Editor's note.

Acts 2022, Sp. Sess. I, cl. 15 provides: “That the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry shall, in conjunction with the Secretary of Public Safety and Homeland Security and Secretary of Health and Human Resources, establish a task force to analyze and make recommendations regarding whether any statutory or regulatory modifications are necessary to ensure the safe and responsible manufacture and sale of industrial hemp extracts and other substances containing tetrahydrocannabinol that are intended for human consumption, orally or by inhalation, in the Commonwealth. The task force shall focus on the current and recommended statutory and regulatory framework for the various isomers, salts, and salts of isomers of tetrahydrocannabinol. Such task force shall include representatives from the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Office of the Attorney General, the Department of Forensic Sciences, the Cannabis Control Authority, and other stakeholders as determined by the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry. The Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry shall report the findings and recommendations of the task force to the Governor and the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services and the House Committee on General Laws by November 15, 2022.”

Effective date.

Acts 2020, cc. 659, 660, became effective April 6, 2020, by emergency clause.

The 2022 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2022 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 2 added the second sentence to subsection C.